Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 7. Annual Settlements; Records; Monies

§ 991.
Records to be delivered to successor.

When a town or town school district office becomes vacant by expiration of the term of office of the incumbent, or otherwise, and a successor is elected or appointed, on demand, he or she shall be entitled to receive from the last incumbent of the office or anyone having possession of the same the records, files, books, and papers of such office, or property of the town or the town school district, as the case may be. A person having such records, files, books, papers, or other property in his or her possession who refuses for ten days after such demand to surrender the same shall be fined $10.00 for each week’s refusal.

§ 992.
Annual settlements; penalty.

Not less than 25 days before each annual town meeting, all officials and other persons authorized to receive or disburse money belonging to a town shall settle their accounts with the auditors of such town, and the treasurer shall include in such settlement his or her accounts as town school district treasurer.
When an officer refuses or neglects to make such settlement, he or she shall be ineligible to reelection for the year ensuing.

§ 993.
Money to be paid over; penalty.

When a person who has served as a town or a town school district officer does not at the expiration of his or her term of office forthwith pay to the proper treasurer all money in his or her hands belonging to the town or town school district, he or she shall be fined not more than $200.00.
The town or town school district, as the case may be, may recover such money of such person in a civil action on this statute.